Washington statutes.
RCW 43.41.394

Oversight of technical aspects of K-20 network.

(1) In overseeing the technical aspects of the K-20 network, the office is not intended to duplicate the statutory responsibilities of the student achievement council, the superintendent of public instruction, the state librarian, or the governing boards of the institutions of higher education.

(2) The office may not interfere in any curriculum or legally offered programming offered over the K-20 network.

(3) The responsibility to review and approve standards and common specifications for the K-20 network remains the responsibility of the office under *RCW 43.41A.025.

(4) The coordination of telecommunications planning for the common schools remains the responsibility of the superintendent of public instruction. Except as set forth in *RCW 43.41A.025(2)(f), the office may recommend, but not require, revisions to the superintendent's telecommunications plans.

[ 2012 c 229 s 586; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 721. Formerly RCW 43.41A.100.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.41A.025 was recodified as RCW 43.105.054 pursuant to 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 221. RCW 43.41A.025 was also amended by 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 108, changing subsection (2)(f) to subsection (2)(e). RCW 43.105.054 was amended by 2024 c 54 s 6, changing subsection (2)(e) to subsection (1)(e).

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.